Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.183.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Interpreter" means a spoken language or sign language interpreter working in a public school, as defined in RCW 28A.150.010, to interpret for students' families, students, and communities in educational settings outside the classroom.

(2) "Qualified interpreter" means an interpreter who is able to interpret effectively, accurately, and impartially, both receptively and expressively using any necessary specialized vocabulary until the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the Washington professional educator standards board establish a different definition in rule making.

(3) "2020 and 2021 reports of the language access work group" means the reports of the language access work group created by section 2, chapter 256, Laws of 2019, and reconvened and expanded by section 501(3)(g), chapter 334, Laws of 2021.

[ 2022 c 107 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2022 c 107: "(1) The legislature finds that:

(a) It is the policy of the state to welcome and encourage the presence of diverse cultures and the use of diverse languages and modalities of communication in business, government, and private affairs in this state. To this end, the state has developed interpreter credentialing programs for court, medical, and social service settings.

(b) According to a report from the United States department of education, 50 years of research has shown that family engagement has beneficial impacts on student grades, test scores, drop-out rates, students' sense of competence, and beliefs about the importance of education. In Washington, many students' family members have language access barriers because they prefer to communicate in a language other than English or require communication assistance services. Washington public schools' ability to effectively communicate with students and their family members who have language access barriers plays a vital role in reducing educational opportunity gaps. Failure to provide language access hinders communication between schools and families, which leads to long-term economic costs when a substantial fraction of the students in Washington are not able to realize their full potential.

(c) Effective two way communication between school staff and student's families in educational settings outside the classroom is not taking place for a variety of reasons, including: (i) Some school districts do not consistently assess the language needs of their communities or consistently evaluate the effectiveness of their language access services; (ii) resources, including time and money, are often not prioritized to engage families with language access barriers; and even when language access is a priority, some districts do not know the best practices for engaging families with language access barriers; (iii) school staff are often not trained on how to engage families with language access barriers, how to engage and use interpreters in educational settings outside the classroom, or when to provide translated documents; and (iv) there are not enough interpreters qualified to work in educational settings outside the classroom.

(d) Providing meaningful, equitable language access to students and their family members who have language access barriers is not only a civil right, but will help students meet the state's basic education goals under RCW 28A.150.210 resulting in a decrease in the educational opportunity gap between learners with language access barriers and other students, because student outcomes improve when families are engaged in their student's education.

(2) Therefore, the legislature intends to require public schools to implement a language access plan and program for culturally responsive, systemic family engagement developed through meaningful stakeholder engagement. The legislature intends to provide training, tools, and other technical assistance to public schools to support the development, implementation, and evaluation of their language access plans and programs. In addition, the legislature intends to direct the development and implementation of credentialing for spoken and sign language interpreters for students' families in educational settings outside the classroom, with the goal of creating a professional interpreter workforce guided by a code of ethics and standards of practice. Finally, the legislature intends to establish an ongoing advisory committee to guide, monitor, and report on the implementation of these new policies." [ 2022 c 107 s 1.]